California, session 20252026, AB588.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 13270) is added to Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 9. Lithium Battery Safety Working Group13270. (a) The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall convene a lithium battery working group to identify those safety issues associated with lithium batteries and associated charging infrastructure installed or used near or within residential or commercial occupancies that have not already been addressed in the 2025 Edition of the California Building Standards Code, and shall recommend potential solutions that will enhance building safety for the State Fire Marshal and other impacted agencies to consider. These recommendations may include any of the following: (1) Informational bulletins.(2) Guidance documents outlining best practices.(3) Educational and training materials.(4) Voluntary and mandatory building standards.(b) The working group shall include the State Fire Marshal and shall also include, but not necessarily be limited to, representatives from the following groups and sectors, as selected by the State Fire Marshal: (1) One representative from the Fire Districts Association of California.(2) One representative from the California Fire Chiefs Association.(3) Two representatives from the California Professional Firefighters.(4) The California Building Standards Commission.(5) (A) One professor with academic expertise in lithium battery chemistry.(B) The State Fire Marshal shall first attempt to select a professor from the University of California who meets the qualifications in subparagraph (A). If the State Fire Marshal is unable to select a University of California professor who meets the qualifications in subparagraph (A), the State Fire Marshal may appoint a professor from another institution who meets the qualifications in subparagraph (A).(6) Local building departments.(7) Fire safety consultants.(8) Parking facility owners, which may include owners of facilities that are stand-alone or that are attached to another use.(9) Commercial property owners.(10) Apartment owners.(11) One licensed electrical contractor.(12) One electrician with Energy Storage and Microgrid Training and Certification.(c) The working group shall establish a clear timeline to guide the initial research, findings, and recommendations, and deliver the initial research, findings, and recommendations on or before January 1, 2027.(d) The sum of ____ dollars ($____) is hereby appropriated from the Building Standards Administration Special Revolving Fund established pursuant to Section 18931.7 to the Office of the State Fire Marshal. These funds shall be used for the following purposes related to addressing building safety concerns associated with lithium batteries and associated charging infrastructure being installed or used near or within residential or commercial occupancies:(1) Paying the operational costs of the working group.(2) Conducting research related to the working group.(3) Developing and publishing guidance documents.(4) Creating educational and training materials.(5) Formulating potential building standards related to lithium battery safety.(6) Identifying practical, cost-effective solutions to reduce or mitigate risks unique to lithium battery fires.SEC. 2. Section 18931.7 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:18931.7. (a) All funds received by the commission under this part shall be deposited in the Building Standards Administration Special Revolving Fund, which is hereby established in the State Treasury.(b) Moneys deposited in the fund shall be available, upon appropriation, to the commission, the department, and the Office of the State Fire Marshal for expenditure in carrying out this part, the provisions of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 17910) that relate to building standards, as defined in Section 18909, and the requirements in Section 13159.5 of this code and subdivision (d) of Section 51189 of the Government Code, with emphasis placed on the development, adoption, publication, and updating of green building standards, the updating of verification guidelines for Tier 1 or Tier 2 green building standards and educational efforts, including, but not limited to, training for local building officials associated with green building standards, and to the Office of the State Fire Marshal to carry out the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 13270) of Part 2 of Division 12.(c) The funds appropriated pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 13270) of Part 2 of Division 12 shall be used to support the lithium battery working group described in that chapter.